Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  Privacy Policy
                  Explore the policy

                  What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?

                  What information do we collect?

                  How do we use your information?

                  How is your information shared on Meta Products or with
                  integrated partners?

                  How do we share information with third parties?

                  How do the Meta Companies work together?

                  How can you manage or delete your information and exercise your
                  rights?

                  How long do we keep your information?

                  How do we transfer information?

                  How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law
                  and prevent harm?

                  How will you know the policy has changed?

                  Privacy notice for United States residents

                  How to contact Meta with questions

                  Why and how we process your information


                  Other policies

                  Terms of Service

                  Cookies Policy

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                  Page 1 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  What is the Privacy Policy and what does it
                  cover?
                  Effective June 15, 2023

                  Read the United States Regional Privacy Notice for more details about how we
                  handle Personal Information and how to exercise your rights.




                     Highlights

                         This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use and share your information.
                         It also describes how long we keep your information and how we keep it safe
                         when we transfer it.

                         The Privacy Policy also lets you know your rights

                         This policy applies to what we call Meta Products, or Products. Our Products
                         include Facebook, Instagram, Messenger and Portal.

                         It also applies to Meta Quest if you log in with a Facebook or Meta account



                  We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use
                  and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps
                  you use Meta Products[1] in the way that’s right for you.

                  In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer
                  information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of the Policy includes
                  helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand.
                  We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy
                  topics that interest you.

                  It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you
                  where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you
                  use. You can update these settings to shape your experience.

                  Read the full policy below.




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 2 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                    What Products does this policy cover? [1]


                    Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy



                     1


                     What Products does this policy cover?




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                         Facebook

                         Messenger

                         Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                         Facebook Portal products

                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                         Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                         Shops

                         Marketplace

                         Spark AR

                         Meta Business Tools

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 3 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         Meta Audience Network

                         Facebook View

                         Meta Pay

                         Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[2] that adds to
                     the information provided in this policy.



                     2


                     Supplemental policies

                         Facebook Portal products


                         Facebook View


                         Free Basics


                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                         Oversight Board



                  What information do we collect?

                     Highlights

                     In this policy we list the kinds of information we collect. Here are some
                     important ones. We collect:

                         The information you give us when you sign up for our Products and create a
                         profile, like your email address or phone number

                         What you do on our Products. This includes what you click on or like, your
                         posts and photos and messages you send. If you use end-to-end encrypted

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 4 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         messaging, we can't read those messages unless users report them to us for
                         review.

                         Who your friends or followers are, and what they do on our Products

                         Information from the phone, computer, or tablet you use our Products on, like
                         what kind it is and what version of our app you’re using

                         Information from partners[3] about things you do both on and off of our
                         Products. This could include other websites you visit, apps you use or online
                         games you play.



                  The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
                  Products[4]. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on
                  Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we
                  collect some information about you even if you don't have an account[5].

                  Here's the information we collect:


                     Your activity and information you provide




                     On our Products[4], you can send messages, take photos and videos, buy or
                     sell things and much more. We call all of the things you can do on our Products
                     "activity." We collect your activity across our Products and information you
                     provide[6], such as:

                         Content you create, like posts, comments or audio[7]


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 5 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings,
                         or through our voice-enabled features. Learn more[8] about what we collect
                         from these features, and how we use information from the camera for
                         masks, filters, avatars and effects.

                         Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
                         applicable law. We can't see the content of end-to-end encrypted messages
                         unless users report them to us for review. Learn more.

                         Metadata[9] about content and messages, subject to applicable law

                         Types of content, including ads, you view or interact with, and how you
                         interact with it

                         Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them. See
                         examples[10].

                         Purchases or other transactions you make, such as through Meta checkout
                         experiences, including credit card information. Learn more[11].

                         Hashtags you use

                         The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products

                     Information with special protections

                     You might choose to provide information about your religious views, your
                     sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical
                     beliefs or trade union membership. These and other types of information could
                     have special protections under the laws of your jurisdiction.



                     Friends, followers and other connections
                     Information we collect about your friends, followers and other
                     connections

                     We collect information about friends, followers, groups, accounts, Facebook
                     Pages and other users and communities you’re connected to and interact with.
                     This includes how you interact with them across our Products and which ones
                     you interact with the most.

                     Information we collect about contacts


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                         Page 6 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     We also collect your contacts’ information, such as their name and email
                     address or phone number, if you choose to upload or import it from a device[12],
                     like by syncing an address book.

                     If you don’t use Meta Products, or use them without an account, your
                     information might still be collected. Learn more about how Meta uses contact
                     information uploaded by account holders.

                     Learn how to upload and delete contacts on Facebook and Messenger, or how
                     to connect your device's contact list on Instagram.

                     Information we collect or infer about you based on others’ activity

                     We collect information about you based on others' activity. See some
                     examples[13].

                     We also infer things about you based on others' activity. For example:

                         We may suggest a friend to you through Facebook's People You May Know
                         feature if you both appear on a contact list that someone uploads.

                         We take into account whether your friends belong to a group when we
                         suggest you join it.




                     App, browser and device information

                     We collect and receive information from and about the different devices[12] you
                     use and how you use them.

                     Device information we collect and receive includes:

                         The device and software you’re using, and other device characteristics. See
                         examples[14].

                         What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground
                         or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)

                         Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’, including Family
                         Device IDs. See examples[15].

                         Signals from your device. See examples[16].

                         Information you’ve shared with us through device settings, like GPS location,

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 7 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                         camera access, photos and related metadata[17]

                         Information about the network you connect your device to and your
                         connection, including your IP address[18]. See more examples[19].

                         Some location-related information, even if Location Services is turned off in
                         your device settings. This includes using IP addresses to estimate your
                         general location.

                         Information about our Products’ performance on your device. Learn more[20].

                         Information from cookies and similar technologies. Learn more.[21]




                     Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
                     What kinds of information do we collect or receive?

                     We collect and receive information from partners[22], measurement vendors,
                     marketing vendors and other third parties[23] about a variety of your information
                     and activities on and off our Products[4].

                     Here are some examples of information we receive about you:

                         Your device[12] information

                         Websites you visit and cookie data, like through Social Plugins or the Meta
                         Pixel

                         Apps you use

                         Games you play

                         Purchases and transactions you make off of our Products using non-Meta
                         checkout experiences

                         Your demographics, like your education level

                         The ads you see and how you interact with them

                         How you use our partners’ products and services, online or in person

                     Partners[3] also share information like your email address, cookies[21] and

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 8 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                   9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     advertising device ID with us. This helps us match your activities with your
                     account, if you have one.

                     We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account
                     on our Products. Learn more about how we connect information from partners
                     to your account.

                     Partners also share with us their communications with you if they instruct us to
                     provide services to their business, like helping them manage their
                     communications. To learn how a business processes or shares your
                     information, read their privacy policy or contact them directly.

                     Take control

                                Off-Facebook activity

                     How do we collect or receive this information from partners?

                     Partners use our Business Tools, integrations and Meta Audience Network
                     technologies to share information with us.

                     These partners collect your information when you visit their site or app or use
                     their services, or through other businesses or organizations they work with. We
                     require partners to have the right to collect, use and share your information
                     before giving it to us.



                  What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
                  Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional,
                  but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.

                  Learn more[24]


                  What if the information we collect doesn’t identify
                  individuals?
                  In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third
                  parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We
                  use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.


                  Take control

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                           Page 9 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                                  Manage the information we collect about you
                                  Privacy Center



                     3


                     Partner
                     A person, business, organization or body using or integrating our Products to
                     advertise, market or support their products and services



                     4


                     What Products does this policy cover?




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                         Facebook

                         Messenger

                         Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                         Facebook Portal products

                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 10 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                         Shops

                         Marketplace

                         Spark AR

                         Meta Business Tools

                         Meta Audience Network

                         Facebook View

                         Meta Pay

                         Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[25] that adds to
                     the information provided in this policy.



                     5


                     Information we collect and receive if you use or interact
                     with our Products but don’t have an account
                     Even if you don't have an account, you may interact with or use Meta
                     Products[4]. Then we collect things like:

                         Browser and app logs of your visits to public content, like Facebook Pages,
                         videos and rooms

                         Basic information about devices[12] that downloaded our apps, like device
                         model and OS

                     We also receive information using cookies and similar technologies, like the
                     Meta Pixel or Social Plugins, when you visit other websites and apps that use
                     our Business Tools or other Meta Products. Read more about information we
                     receive from partners, vendors and other third parties in this policy and in our
                     Cookies Policy.



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 11 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     Examples of why we collect and receive information
                     Security of our Products

                     For example, we collect information to monitor attempted attacks on our
                     systems, such as overloading our servers with traffic. Also, if we see someone
                     without an account trying to load too many pages, they could be trying to
                     scrape our site in violation of our terms. Then we can take action to prevent it.

                     Safety and integrity

                     For example, if someone without an account joins a room and shares a harmful
                     video, we can take action according to our Community Standards. We can
                     remove content that violates our terms and policies, or share information with
                     law enforcement when we believe there is a genuine risk of death or imminent
                     bodily harm.

                     Advertising

                     For example, you may also see ads for the Meta Company Products shown
                     through Meta Audience Network when you visit other apps if we can’t
                     recognize you as a registered user of the Meta Products.

                     Performance

                     For example, we collect information when people use our Products, even if
                     they don’t have an account, to measure how fast our pages load in different
                     countries and whether they're working properly. This helps us identify and fix
                     issues with local networks.



                     6


                     Information you provide
                     For example, when you create a Facebook account, you must provide some
                     information, like a password and your email address or phone number. You
                     might choose to add other details to your account, like a profile photo or
                     payment information.

                     We also collect information you provide when you:


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 12 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         Create your avatar

                         Fill out a form

                         Contact us



                     7


                     Audio content you create
                     You can create audio content, like if you're a host or speaker in an audio-only
                     broadcast. Anyone in the audience for the broadcast can listen to this audio
                     content.



                     8


                          What we collect from our camera feature




                          José likes using Instagram’s Camera feature to take pictures of his
                          flower garden. We collect information about how José uses the
                          Camera feature. For example, if he chooses a background effect for
                          the photo he’s about to take, we collect information from the
                          camera so we can apply the effect to his photo.



                          How filters, effects, masks and avatars work

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 13 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                        9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                          If you use our camera or allow access to photos and videos, on
                          certain Meta Products you can add filters, effects, masks or avatars.
                          Some of these features process parts of faces or bodies within the
                          camera frame, photo or video. Then they can do things like fit a
                          mask correctly over the eyes, nose and mouth. The information we
                          use for this process is used to create the feature. It’s not used to
                          identify you.



                          What we collect from voice-enabled features




                          Ren tells Meta’s voice-enabled Assistant to take a photo on Ray-
                          Ban Stories. A visual indicator shows that Assistant is activated and
                          listening for Ren’s command. We collect this voice interaction,
                          which includes any background sound that occurs when Ren says
                          the command. Collecting Ren’s voice interactions lets us provide
                          and, depending on Ren’s settings, improve the Assistant feature.


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                               Page 14 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     9


                     Metadata
                          Information about the content itself, like the location where a photo was
                          taken or the date a file was created

                          Information about the message itself, like the type of message or the date
                          and time it was sent



                     10


                     Apps and features you use, and how you use them
                     For example, we log:

                          What apps, posts, videos, ads, games, Shops and other content you view or
                          interact with on our Products

                          What features you access from our messaging products

                          When you use Social Plugins, Facebook Login, in-app browser link history
                          or autofill

                          Information about websites that you visit or interact with when you use our
                          in-app browser. Learn more.



                     11


                     Purchases or other transactions
                     We collect information when you use our Products to buy or sell things or make
                     other financial transactions.

                     Some examples are:



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 15 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Purchases within an online game

                          Donations to a friend’s fundraiser

                          Purchases in Marketplace, Shops or groups

                          Purchases made using Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences

                          Money transfers to friends and family (where available)

                     What we collect from transactions

                     When you buy things or make other payments in Marketplace, Shops or
                     groups, or use other Meta checkout experiences, we collect information about
                     your purchase or other financial transactions, like:

                          Credit or debit card number and other card information

                          Billing, shipping and contact details

                          Items you bought and how many

                          Other account and authentication information

                     Why we collect this information

                     We collect and store this information to personalize your experience on our
                     Products, for advertising and to allow you to access and view your payment
                     and transaction history, where available.

                     And, depending on your choices, you can use it the next time you shop to give
                     you easier, faster shopping experiences.


                     More in the Privacy Policy

                        How do we use your information?


                        How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and
                        prevent harm?




                     12


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 16 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                         9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Device
                     Devices include computers, phones, hardware, connected TVs, Portal devices
                     and other web-connected devices.



                     13


                     When we collect information based on others’ activity
                     For example, we collect information about you on Meta Products when others:

                          Share or comment on a photo you’re tagged in

                          Send you a message

                          Invite you to join a conversation

                          Upload their address book that has your contact information in it

                          Invite you to play a game



                     14


                     What device you’re using, and other device
                     characteristics
                     We collect device information like:

                          The type of device

                          Details about its operating system

                          Details about its hardware and software

                          Brand and model

                          Battery level

                          Signal strength


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                Page 17 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Available storage

                          Browser type

                          App and file names and types

                          Plugins



                     15


                     Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
                     Identifiers we collect include device IDs, mobile advertiser ID or IDs from
                     games, apps or accounts you use. We also collect Family Device IDs or other
                     identifiers unique to Meta Company Products associated with the same device
                     or account.



                     16


                     Device signals
                     Device signals include GPS, Bluetooth signals, nearby Wi-Fi access points,
                     beacons and cell towers.



                     17


                     Related metadata
                     For example, if you give us permission to access your device’s camera roll, we
                     collect metadata. This metadata is from and about your photos and videos and
                     includes the date and time they were made. We use this to do things like
                     remind you when you have new photos to upload.



                     18


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 18 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     IP address
                     Stands for "internet protocol address." It’s a unique number assigned to a
                     device, like a phone or computer, that allows it to communicate over the
                     internet. Numbers are assigned according to standard guidelines, or protocols.

                     Just like you need a mailing address to receive a letter from a friend, your
                     device needs an IP address to receive information on the internet.



                     19


                     Information about the network you connect your
                     device to and your internet connection
                     Information about your network and connection includes:

                          The name of your mobile operator or internet service provider (ISP)

                          Language

                          Time zone

                          Mobile phone number

                          IP address

                          Connection and download speed

                          Network capability

                          Information about other devices that are nearby or on your network

                          Wi-Fi hotspots you connect to using our Products

                     One reason we collect this information is to make your experience better. For
                     example, if we know that your phone and TV are connected to the same
                     network, we can help you use your phone to control a video stream on your TV.


                     More in the Privacy Policy



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 19 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        How do we use your information?




                     20


                     Information about our Products’ performance on your
                     device
                     We collect device information to prevent, diagnose, troubleshoot and fix errors
                     and bugs. This includes how long the app was running, what model of device
                     you were using and other performance and diagnostic information.



                     21


                     Information from cookies and similar technologies
                     Cookies are small pieces of text used to store information on web browsers.
                     We use cookies and similar technologies, including data that we store on your
                     web browser or device, identifiers associated with your device and other
                     software, Social Plugins and the Meta Pixel. They help us provide, protect and
                     improve our Products, such as by personalizing content, tailoring and
                     measuring ads and providing a safer experience.

                     We collect information from cookies stored on your device, including cookie IDs
                     and settings.

                     Read our cookie policies:

                          Meta Cookies Policy

                          Instagram Cookies Policy



                     22


                     Types of partners
                     Partners

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 20 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Our partners[3] use our Products, including our Business Tools and other
                     technologies that allow businesses to advertise or support their products.
                     Business Tools also help our partners understand and measure how people
                     are using their products and services and how well their ads are working. For
                     example, they might put one of our Business Tools, the Meta Pixel, on their
                     website. Or they might use Meta Audience Network tools to monetize their
                     apps by showing ads from businesses that advertise on Facebook.

                     Integrated partners


                     Integrated partners[26] also use our Products, specifically the technologies that
                     help you make a connection to them. For example, you might log into their app
                     or website using Facebook Login. Or you might play their game on Facebook,
                     which we call an integration because you can play without leaving our app.

                     Who are our partners and integrated partners?

                     Here are some examples:

                          Advertisers

                          Businesses and people that use our Products to sell or offer goods and
                          services

                          Publishers (like a website or app) and their measurement vendors

                          App developers

                          Game developers

                          Device manufacturers, internet service providers and mobile network
                          operators

                          E-commerce platforms



                     23


                     Other third parties we get information from
                     Some people, businesses, organizations and bodies share information with
                     Meta but don’t necessarily use our Products. We collect and receive

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 21 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     information from these other third parties[27], including:

                         Publicly available sources, like academic papers and public forums

                         Industry peers, such as other online platforms and technology companies

                         Marketing and advertising vendors and data providers, who have the rights
                         to provide us with your information

                         Companies or organizations that provide content, including videos, photos,
                         and audio

                         Law enforcement

                         Government authorities

                         Professional and non-profit groups, like NGOs, and charities

                         Academic and research institutions, like universities, non-profit research
                         groups and think tanks

                     Third-party public sources

                     For example, we get datasets from publicly available sources, research
                     institutions and professional and non-profit groups. We use these datasets to:

                         Detect and stop scraping in violation of our terms

                         Take other actions to promote the safety, security and integrity of our
                         Products, our users, the public and our personnel and property

                         Improve our AI technologies and support AI research and product
                         development, such as translations, computer vision, content understanding,
                         natural language processing, and tools for people and businesses to create
                         content

                         Engage with research survey respondents who choose to participate in
                         additional conversations


                     More in the Privacy Policy

                        How do we use your information?



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 22 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     24


                     What happens if you don’t let us collect certain
                     information
                     For example, if you don’t provide an email address or phone number, we won’t
                     be able to create an account for you to use our Products.

                     Or you can choose not to add Facebook friends, but then your Facebook Feed
                     won’t show friends’ photos and status updates.



                     25


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board




                     26


                     Integrated partner
                     A partner who uses technologies that help you make a connection to them
                     through our Products, including plugins, login, checkout experiences, instant
                     games, and other such integrations




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 23 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     27


                     Third party
                     A person, business, organization or body that is not part of the Meta
                     Companies



                  How do we use your information?

                     Highlights

                     Here are some of the ways we use your information:

                         We personalize your experience, like by suggesting reels to watch or
                         communities to join

                         We improve our Products by applying information about what you use them
                         to do, and what else is happening on your device when our app crashes

                         We work to prevent harmful behavior and keep people safe on our Products

                         We send you messages about the Products you use or ones you might like,
                         if you let us

                         We research for the good of people around the world, like to advance
                         technology or to help out in a crisis



                  We use information we collect to provide a personalized experience to you,
                  including ads, along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.


                  For some of these purposes, we use information across our Products[28] and across
                  your devices[29]. The information we use for these purposes is automatically
                  processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use manual review[30] to
                  access and review your information.

                  To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-
                  identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you.
                  We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 24 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                  this section.

                  Here are the ways we use your information:


                  To provide, personalize and improve our Products

                  We use information we have to provide and improve our Products[31]. This includes
                  personalizing features, content and recommendations, such as your Facebook
                  Feed[32], Instagram feed, Stories and ads. We use information with special
                  protections you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.

                  Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our
                  Products:


                     How we show ads and other sponsored or commercial content
                     When you use our Products, you see ads and sponsored or commercial
                     content, like product listings in Shops. You also see ads shown through Meta
                     Audience Network when you visit other apps. We want everything you see to
                     be interesting and useful to you.

                     To decide what to show you and others, we use information we have about you,
                     including:

                         Your profile information

                         Your activity on and off our Products, including information we receive
                         through cookies and similar technologies, according to your settings

                         Content you create or interact with across Facebook and Instagram

                         Things we infer about you, like topics we think you may be interested in

                         Information about your friends, followers or other connections, including their
                         activity or interests

                     See some examples.[33]

                     Learn more about some of the ways we show you ads that we think may be
                     interesting to you, including using machine learning.

                     Take control



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 25 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                  9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                                     Learn more about how ads work
                                     Privacy Center


                                                             Manage ad preferences



                     How we use information to improve our Products
                     We’re always trying to make our Products better and create new ones with the
                     features you want. Information we collect from you helps us learn how.

                     We use information we collect to:

                         See if a product is working correctly

                         Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not

                         Test out new products and features to see if they work

                         Get feedback on our ideas for products or features

                         Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products
                         and brands and what we can do better




                     How we use location-related information
                     We use location-related information that you allow us to receive if you turn on
                     the Location Services device setting. This includes things like your GPS
                     location and, depending on the operating system you're using, other device
                     signals[34].

                     We also receive and use some location-related information even if Location
                     Services is turned off. This includes:

                         IP addresses[35], which we use to estimate your general location. We can
                         use IP addresses to estimate your specific location if it’s necessary to protect
                         the safety and security of you or others.

                         Your and others' activity on our Products, like check-ins and events

                         Information you give us directly, like if you enter your current city on your


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                         Page 26 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         profile, or provide your address in Marketplace

                     We use location-related information, such as your current location, where you
                     live, the places you like to go and the businesses and people you're near, to do
                     the things described in the “How do we use your information?” section of the
                     Policy, like:

                         Provide, personalize and improve our Products, including ads, for you and
                         others. See an example[36].

                         Detect suspicious activity and help keep your account secure. Learn how.[37]

                     Take control

                        How to manage Facebook location settings
                        Facebook Help Center


                        How to turn Instagram location services on or off
                        Instagram Help Center


                                                             Manage location settings


                  To promote safety, security and integrity

                  We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe,
                  secure Products.

                  Learn more

                  To provide measurement, analytics and business services

                  Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses. We help
                  them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are
                  working.

                  Learn more

                  To communicate with you

                  We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact
                  information you've entered on your profile.


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 27 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                  Learn more

                  To research and innovate for social good

                  We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from
                  publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and
                  support research.

                  Learn more



                     Promoting safety, security and integrity
                     Here are some ways we promote safety, security and integrity. We work to:

                         Verify accounts and activity

                         Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the
                         decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board.
                         They may use information we have when they review our decisions. Learn
                         more about how the Oversight Board processes information.

                         Investigate suspicious activity

                         Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior

                         Identify and combat disparities and racial bias against historically
                         marginalized communities

                         Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences

                         Detect when someone needs help and provide support

                         Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property

                         Maintain the integrity of our Products

                     Learn more about how we work to keep Meta a safe place for everyone.

                     Take control

                                Account security




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 28 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Providing measurement, analytics and business services
                     To provide measurement and analytics services, we use the information we
                     collect about you across your accounts on our Products.

                     Our measurement and analytics services help our partners[38] understand
                     things like:

                         How many people see and interact with their products, services or content,
                         including posts, videos, Facebook Pages, listings, Shops and ads (including
                         those shown through apps using Meta Audience Network)

                         How people interact with their content, websites, apps and services

                         What types of people[39] interact with their content or use their services

                         How people use our partners' products and services to connect to Meta
                         Products, the performance of their connection and networks and users'
                         experience with them

                     We also use the information we collect to provide business services.

                     More in the Privacy Policy

                        How do we share information with partners, vendors, service providers
                        and other third parties?




                     Communicating with you
                     We communicate with you in a few different ways. For example:

                         We send messages about the Products we know you use, using the email
                         you register to your account

                         Depending on your settings, we send marketing communications about
                         Products you might like

                         We ask you to participate in research based on things like how you use our
                         Products

                         We let you know about our policies and terms of service


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 29 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         When you contact us with questions, we reply to your email

                         We facilitate customer support communications with you when you've told
                         us, either directly or through a third party[40], that you have questions or
                         concerns about our Products

                     We also use information about how you interact with our messages, like if you
                     open an email from us. This helps us understand the best way to reach you
                     and whether our communications are helpful.

                     Take control

                                Communication preferences




                     Researching and innovating for social good
                     We research and innovate to help people around the world. Our goals include:

                         Contributing to social good and areas of public interest

                         Advancing technology

                         Improving safety, health and well-being

                     Here are some examples of our research:

                         We analyze information about where groups of people go during crises. This
                         helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.

                         We work with independent researchers to better understand the impact
                         social media might have on elections and democratic processes

                         We’ve collaborated with academics and industry experts to help improve
                         internet access and quality in rural areas

                         We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning
                         to do things like create COVID-19 forecasting models

                     Learn more about our research programs



                  More in the Privacy Policy

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 30 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                    Why and how we process your information



                     28


                     Using information across our Products
                     We use information across your accounts on our Products to:

                          Personalize ads for you and others. Learn more.

                          Measure the performance of those ads. Learn more.

                          Provide more personalized features, content and suggestions across our
                          Products. See examples[41].

                          More accurately count people and understand how they use our Products

                          Help keep you and others safe. Learn more.

                     If you add accounts to the same Accounts Center, we also use your
                     information to offer connected experiences and improve your experiences
                     across accounts. See an example.[42]


                     Take control

                        How to add or delete accounts in your Accounts Center
                        Facebook Help Center


                                                             Manage accounts



                     29


                     Why we use information across devices

                     One reason we use your information across devices[43] is to help us give you a
                     more personalized experience. For example, we might show you an ad on your
                     phone, and later you might use your laptop to click on the ad and buy the

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 31 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     product. By combining that information across your devices, we can
                     understand what ads are relevant to you and help businesses measure how
                     well their ad performed.



                     30


                     Manual review
                     Examples of when we use manual review

                          Our reviewers help us promote safety, security and integrity across our
                          Products. For example, reviewers can look for and remove content that
                          violates our terms and policies and keep content that doesn’t break our
                          terms and policies available. Their work supplements our technology that
                          detects violations.

                          When our algorithms detect that someone might need help, a reviewer can
                          review their post and offer support if needed.

                          We also use manual review to analyze content to train our algorithms to
                          review content the same way a person would. This improves our automatic
                          processing, which in turn helps us improve our products.

                     Who reviews this information

                     Our reviewers work at Meta, for Meta Companies or for a trusted service
                     provider[44]. We require every reviewer who's allowed access to your
                     information to meet privacy and security standards.

                     Learn more about how Meta prioritizes content for manual review.



                     31


                     What Products does this policy cover?




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 32 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                         Facebook

                         Messenger

                         Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                         Facebook Portal products

                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                         Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                         Shops

                         Marketplace

                         Spark AR

                         Meta Business Tools

                         Meta Audience Network

                         Facebook View

                         Meta Pay

                         Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[45] that adds to

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 33 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                  9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     the information provided in this policy.



                     32


                     How we personalize your Facebook Feed
                     Your Facebook Feed is unique to you. We order (or “rank”) the content you can
                     see in your Feed, and you can learn more about the different types of signals
                     we use to rank it. We also suggest content that’s relevant to you.

                     Many things influence the content you see in your Feed.

                     For example:

                          If your friends, connections or people you may know interact with a
                          Facebook Page, post or certain topic, we can suggest similar content to you.
                          So if your friend Ahmad comments on a post about national parks, we can
                          suggest the national parks post to you.

                          If you and others interact with the same group, Facebook Page or post, we
                          can suggest another group, Page or post that they interact with for you. So if
                          you and Sharmila are in the same cat lovers group and Sharmila likes a
                          Page that sells scarves, we might suggest the scarves Page to you.

                          If you’ve recently engaged with a certain topic on Facebook, we might then
                          suggest other posts that are related to that topic. So if you recently liked or
                          commented on a post from a basketball Page, we could suggest other posts
                          about basketball.

                          You might see posts based on where you are and what people near you are
                          interacting with on Facebook. So if you’re near a sports stadium, we can
                          suggest games or events occurring at the stadium. Learn more about how
                          we use location-related information.


                     Take control

                        How to manage your Facebook Feed
                        Facebook Help Center




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                         Page 34 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                     9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        How to manage your Instagram feed
                        Instagram Help Center


                                                             Manage Facebook Feed



                     33


                          Your activity on our Products




                          For example, William checks into a local bakery on Facebook, so
                          later we might show him ads on Instagram for other local bakeries.



                          Your activity on third-party websites and apps, depending
                          on your settings




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                            Page 35 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          For example, Jane buys a pair of shoes from an online shoe store or
                          in an online chat with a shoe seller. The seller shares Jane’s activity
                          with us using our Business Tools, subject to our Business Tools
                          Terms.

                          Later, Jane sees an ad on Instagram for a discount on her next shoe
                          purchase from the online store.

                          If she doesn't want to see ads from this shoe store again, she can
                          hide them in her Advertisers setting. Or if she doesn’t want us to
                          show her any ads based on her activity on other websites and apps,
                          she can make sure that this setting is turned off in her ad
                          preferences.



                          Topics we think you might be interested in




                          For example, Jon likes several Facebook Pages about famous
                          musicians, so we think he has an interest in "music."

                          Based on this interest, we might show him an ad for a local record
                          shop or an online music publication.

                          Jon can manage his interests in his ad topics.



                          Your connections




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 36 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                          For example, Fiona’s friend likes an Instagram account for a local art
                          fair. Based on her friend’s activity, we might show Fiona an ad for
                          the art fair.




                     34


                     Other device signals we receive
                     We receive different types of device signals from different operating systems.
                     They include things like nearby Bluetooth or Wi-Fi connections.



                     35


                     IP address
                     Stands for "internet protocol address." It’s a unique number assigned to a
                     device, like a phone or computer, that allows it to communicate over the
                     internet. Numbers are assigned according to standard guidelines, or protocols.

                     Just like you need a mailing address to receive a letter from a friend, your
                     device needs an IP address to receive information on the internet.



                     36

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 37 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                          Personalizing ads for you and others




                          For example, Marcus is going on a trip and wants to use Find Wi-Fi
                          to find free, public Wi-Fi at the airport. He has turned on Location
                          Services on his device and allowed location access on the Facebook
                          app, so we can use his GPS information to help him find the most
                          relevant public Wi-Fi networks. We’ll also use this information to
                          show him ads for local businesses near the airport.

                          Later, Marcus turns off Location Services before he lands, so we
                          don’t collect his GPS information anymore. Later on his trip, he
                          opens the Facebook app, and we can use the IP address we receive
                          to estimate Marcus’ general location and show him ads for
                          businesses nearby.




                     37


                     Helping to keep your account secure
                     For example, we use information about the locations you normally log in from,
                     combined with other information, to detect suspicious activity. So if we detect
                     an attempt to log into your account from a new location, we can check that it’s
                     really you.



                     38


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 38 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Partner
                     A person, business, organization or body using or integrating our Products to
                     advertise, market or support their products and services



                     39


                     Information we provide about different types of people
                     For example, we might tell an advertiser that their ad was seen by women
                     aged 25–34 who live in Madrid and like software engineering.



                     40


                     Third party
                     A person, business, organization or body that is not part of the Meta
                     Companies



                     41


                     Providing more personalized features, content and
                     suggestions across our Products
                     For example we can:

                          Automatically fill in registration information, like your phone number, from
                          one Meta Product when you sign up for an account on a different Product

                          Let others see and search your name and profile photo across our Products
                          and communicate with you

                          Show all interactions in one place for content you’ve cross-posted to
                          different Products




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 39 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     42


                     Using your information if you add accounts to the same
                     Accounts Center
                     For example, if you follow your favorite team on Instagram, we can more easily
                     suggest that you follow that team’s Page on Facebook.

                     Learn more about how we use information across accounts if you add
                     accounts to the same Accounts Center.



                     43


                     Device
                     Devices include computers, phones, hardware, connected TVs, Portal devices
                     and other web-connected devices.



                     44


                     Service provider
                     A person, business, organization or body that provides services to Meta or to
                     our users on behalf of Meta. For example, our service providers do things like
                     investigate suspicious activity and provide customer support.



                     45


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 40 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board



                  How is your information shared on Meta
                  Products or with integrated partners?

                     Highlights

                         You can choose to share information on our Products or with integrated
                         partners

                         Remember to share only with people you trust

                         You might decide to use a product that integrates with one of ours, like if you
                         use Facebook Login to log into a music service or a shopping site

                         If you do, that organization will ask you to receive some information about
                         you, like your email address or birthday




                  On Meta Products

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 41 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                  Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
                  Products[46]:


                     People and accounts you share and communicate with
                     When you share and communicate using our Products, you can sometimes
                     choose the audience[47] for what you share.

                     When you interact with people or businesses, they can see:

                     What you share with them

                     For example, the audience you choose can see when you:

                         Share a post you’ve written

                         Share a photo or video

                         Create a story

                         Share a news article

                         Add information to your profile

                     What you communicate with them

                     People you interact with can see what you send to them. So if you send a
                     person or a business a message on Messenger or Instagram, that person or
                     business can read your message.

                     Some of your activity

                     People and businesses can also see some of your activity on our Products.
                     This includes when you:

                         Comment on or react to others’ posts

                         Engage with ads or other sponsored or commercial content, like by
                         commenting or liking

                         Allow content you've shared about a product in a Shop to be shared across
                         our Products

                         View their story on Facebook or Instagram

                         Connect a new Meta device, like Portal or Ray-Ban Stories, to your account

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 42 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     When you’re active

                     Some of our Products might provide you with settings that allow others to see
                     when you're active on our Products, such as “active status.” In some cases, we
                     also offer settings that allow others to see when you’re active in a particular
                     section of one of our Products, like a message thread, game or event, or when
                     you last used one of our Products.

                     Learn how to update your Active Status on Facebook and Messenger, or how
                     to update your Activity Status on Instagram.



                     Content others share or reshare about you
                     Who can see or reshare your content

                     People in your audience can view your content and can choose to share it with
                     others outside your audience, on and off our Products. For example, when you
                     share a post or send a message to specific friends, they can download,
                     screenshot or reshare it with anyone, on, across or off our Products.

                     When you comment on a post or react to a photo, your comment or reaction
                     can be seen by anyone who can see the post or photo. This can include people
                     you aren’t connected to. The person who shared the post can also change their
                     audience at any time after you’ve interacted with it.

                     How information about you can be shared

                     People who use our Products can share information about you with the
                     audience they choose. For example, they can:

                         Share a photo or video of you in a post, comment, story, reel or message

                         Mention you in a post or story

                         Tag you in a post, comment, story or location

                         Share details about you in a post, story or message

                     If you’re uncomfortable with what others have shared about you on our
                     Products, you can always choose to report posts and stories.

                     Take control




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 43 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        Remove a tag from a photo or post on Facebook
                        Facebook Help Center


                        Remove a tag from a photo or video on Instagram
                        Instagram Help Center


                                                             Manage tags



                     Public content
                     What content is public?

                     Some of your information and activity are always public. This includes your
                     name, Facebook and Instagram username, profile picture and activity on public
                     Facebook Pages and groups.

                     Other content you can choose to set to Public, like posts, photos and videos
                     you post to your profile, Stories or Reels.

                     Who can see public content?

                     When content is public, it can be seen by anyone on or across our Products,
                     and in some cases off our Products, even if they don’t have an account.

                     For example, if you comment on Marketplace, a public Facebook Page or a
                     public Instagram account, or if you leave a rating or review, your comment,
                     rating or review will be visible to anyone. It could appear in any of our Products
                     or be seen by anyone, including off our Products.

                     Where can public content be shared?

                     We, you and people using our Products can send public content (like your
                     profile photo, or information you share on a Facebook Page or public Instagram
                     account) to anyone on, across or off our Products. For example, users can
                     share it in a public forum, or it can appear in search results on the internet.

                     Public content can also be seen, accessed, reshared or downloaded through
                     third-party services, like:

                         Search engines. Learn more[48].

                         APIs



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 44 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         The media, like TV

                         Other apps and websites connected to our Products

                     Take control

                        Public information on Facebook
                        Facebook Help Center


                        How to make a public account private on Instagram
                        Instagram Help Center


                                                             Manage public information



                  With integrated partners

                  You can choose to connect with integrated partners[49] who use our Products. If you
                  do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.

                  These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our
                  Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle
                  your information:


                     When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
                     Information they receive automatically

                     When you use an integrated partner’s products or services, they can access:

                         What you post or share from these products or services

                         What you use their services to do

                         Information from and about the device you’re using

                         The language setting you’ve chosen on our Products

                     See examples[50] of when an integrated partner might receive your information.

                     Information they receive with your permission

                     Sometimes these integrated partners ask you for permission to access certain

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 45 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     additional information from your Facebook, Instagram or Messenger account.
                     In their request, they’ll explain what information they’d like to access and let
                     you choose whether to share it.

                     On Facebook, this includes things like your email address, hometown or
                     birthday. On Instagram, this includes content, like photos and videos, that
                     you’ve shared from your account when the account was set to private.

                     Learn what happens if you choose to share your friends list, or if your friends
                     choose to share their friends list.[51]

                     We automatically log when you receive a request from an integrated partner to
                     access your information. These requests to access information are separate
                     from the Apps and Websites access that you manage in your Facebook or
                     Instagram ad settings or in your mobile device settings.

                     How long they can access your information

                     Apps or websites you’ve logged into using Facebook Login or connected to
                     your Instagram account can access your nonpublic information on Meta
                     Products unless it appears to us that you haven’t used the app or website in 90
                     days. Note that even if an app’s access to your information has expired, it can
                     still retain information you shared with it previously.

                     We encourage you to visit your Apps and Websites settings from time to time to
                     review which apps and websites continue to have access to your information
                     through Facebook Login or Instagram.

                     Take control

                        How to manage apps and websites on Facebook
                        Facebook Help Center


                        How to manage apps and websites on Instagram
                        Instagram Help Center


                                                             Manage apps and websites



                     When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated
                     partner’s product or service
                     Integrated partners receive information about your activity when you interact
                     with other Facebook, Instagram or Messenger users while they’re using the

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 46 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     integrated partner’s product or service.

                     For example, a gamer livestreams to Facebook using a partner app. Then you
                     comment on that livestream. The app developer will receive information about
                     your comment.



                     How integrated partners handle your information
                     Integrated partners handle the information you share with them according to
                     their own terms and policies, not Meta’s. You can review their privacy policy on
                     their website or app to learn how they receive and process your information. In
                     some cases, they use a separate service provider to receive and process your
                     information.

                     More resources

                        How Meta reviews apps that integrate with our Products
                        Facebook Developers




                  Take control

                                  Learn more about audiences
                                  Privacy Center


                                                             Manage apps and websites



                     46


                     What Products does this policy cover?




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 47 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                         Facebook

                         Messenger

                         Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                         Facebook Portal products

                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                         Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                         Shops

                         Marketplace

                         Spark AR

                         Meta Business Tools

                         Meta Audience Network

                         Facebook View

                         Meta Pay

                         Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[52] that adds to

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 48 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                  9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     the information provided in this policy.



                     47


                     Choosing an audience
                     On Facebook, the audience can be made up of:

                          The public, including people on and off Facebook

                          Your friends and other connections, such as the friends of people you tag

                          A customized list of people

                          Yourself

                          The members of a single community, such as a group

                     On Instagram, you can set the audience for what you share by choosing
                     between a private or public account. With a private account, only followers you
                     approve can see what you share. With a public account, your posts and other
                     content on Instagram can be seen by anyone, on or off our Products, including
                     if they don’t have an account. You can restrict the audience for your content by
                     blocking individual accounts from viewing them. You can also create a close
                     friends list for certain types of content that only the people on that list can see.


                     Take control

                        Audience settings
                        Manage your audience settings on Facebook or Instagram.

                     Audience settings are different from app permissions

                     Your audience settings are different from the permissions you give to individual
                     apps and websites to access your information. Read our policy about how you
                     may share information with integrated partners.



                     48


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                         Page 49 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Search engines
                     You can visit your privacy settings to control whether search engines outside
                     Facebook can link to your profile. But other public content–like if you post with
                     your audience set to Public, or post on public Pages or accounts–might still be
                     accessible through search engines, depending on the settings of that account.



                     49


                     Integrated partner
                     A partner who uses technologies that help you make a connection to them
                     through our Products, including plugins, login, checkout experiences, instant
                     games, and other such integrations



                     50


                          When an integrated partner might receive your information




                          For example, you might use your Facebook login to play an online
                          game with your Facebook friends. The game developer
                          automatically receives information about your activities in the
                          game.




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 50 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                  9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                          When an integrated partner might receive your information




                          Or you might use the Facebook Like button on an article posted on
                          a news website. The website developer automatically receives
                          information about your Like on their article.




                     51


                     Sharing friends lists
                     When you share your friends list

                     If you use Facebook Login to log into an app, the app developer might request
                     access to your list of Facebook friends. Here's what happens if you give the
                     app developer permission to view these lists:

                          They can view and access a list of your Facebook friends who use the same
                          app and have given the app permission to access their list of friends. They
                          can’t access nonpublic information about your friends or followers through
                          this process. Note that the app developer will receive more information
                          about your friends if your friends choose to share it themselves. They can
                          share it by providing the information directly or giving the developer
                          permission to access information from their account.

                          You’ll appear on friends lists that your Facebook friends can choose to share
                          with the same app. You can remove this permission, or the app entirely, if
                          you later decide that you don’t want to share your friends list with an app, or
                          don’t want to appear on other friends lists shared with that app.

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                         Page 51 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     When your friends share their friends list

                     Your friends might choose to share their friends lists with app developers
                     through Facebook Login. But your friends can’t use Facebook Login to share
                     nonpublic information about you.



                     52


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board



                  How do we share information with third parties?

                     Highlights

                     We share certain information with:

                         Advertisers who show ads on our Products

                         Businesses we hire to market our Products for us

                         Businesses we hire to do things like offer customer service or conduct
                         surveys

                         Researchers who use it to do things like innovate, advance technology, or
                         improve people’s safety

                     We don’t sell your information, and we never will.

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 52 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
                  partners[53] and other third parties[54] to follow rules about how they can and cannot
                  use and disclose the information we provide.

                  Here’s more detail about who we share information with:


                  Partners

                     Advertisers and Audience Network publishers
                     Advertisers

                     We provide advertisers with reports about the number and kinds of people who
                     see and engage with their ads. These reports include information about the
                     general demographics and interests of people who engaged with an
                     advertiser’s ad. Then advertisers can better understand their audience. See an
                     example[55].

                     Meta also provides advertisers and their vendors with information about:

                         Ads people engaged with, if any

                         When people engaged with ads

                         Where that ad was shown (for example, on Instagram, or on Facebook)

                     We also confirm which ads you viewed that led you to take an action with an

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 53 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     advertiser, such as downloading an advertiser's app. But we don't share
                     information with these advertisers and their vendors that by itself can be used
                     to contact or identify you, such as your name or email address, unless you give
                     us permission.[56]

                     Audience Network publishers and their vendors

                     Meta Audience Network lets advertisers place ads with us that will be published
                     on other apps and websites outside of Meta.

                     To help show you ads on their apps and websites, we share information with
                     publishers who use Audience Network, as well as vendors who facilitate that
                     use. For example, we share:

                         How many people see and engage with ads on publisher apps

                         Information related to or in response to a publisher’s request to serve an ad
                         on its app.

                     But we don't share information with these publishers and their vendors that by
                     itself can be used to contact or identify you, such as your name or email
                     address, unless you give us permission[56].



                     Partners who use our analytics services

                     People rely on our Products[57], like business accounts, professional tools and
                     Facebook Pages, to run and promote their businesses. Businesses use our
                     analytics services to understand more about how people are using their
                     content, features, products and services.

                     To provide these services, we use the information we collect about you. We put
                     this information into aggregate reports so that partners can see how well their
                     content, features, products and services are performing and are able to
                     understand things like users’ experience with such content, products and
                     services.

                     These reports aggregate information like:

                         How many people interacted with our partners' content, products or services

                         The general demographics and interests[55] of the people who interacted
                         with it



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 54 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         How people use our partners’ products and services to connect to Meta
                         Products and the performance of their connection and networks

                     Advertisers also receive other information. Read our policy about how we share
                     information with advertisers.



                     Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and
                     commerce services platforms

                     When you choose to make a transaction[58], or otherwise choose to share
                     information with a seller, creator, fundraiser, charity, payment services provider
                     or commerce services platform[59], we share information with them and with
                     any providers acting on their behalf.

                     Depending on how you interact with them, they receive:

                         Information to complete your transaction, like order, payment, contact and
                         shipping information

                         Information to help ensure the security of the transaction, like information
                         about your device or connection

                         Any information required by applicable regulation

                         Other information you choose to share with them

                     For example, if you make a purchase from an Instagram shop using checkout,
                     the shop will receive information to complete your transaction. This may include
                     your order items, your contact details and shipping information. If the shop uses
                     a payment services provider, such as PayPal, to facilitate the transaction, the
                     provider will receive the transaction amount, a transaction description (to
                     appear on your credit card statement) and your payment card information, such
                     as cardholder name, card number, expiration date and billing address. Learn
                     more about payments on Instagram.



                     Integrated partners
                     When you choose to use integrated partners’ products or services, they may
                     receive information about you and your activity. Read the policy.




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 55 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  Vendors

                     Measurement vendors
                     We don’t create every measurement and analytics report ourselves.

                     We share information (like whether people saw an ad or engaged with it) with
                     our measurement vendors[60], who aggregate it to provide their reports.

                     For example, an advertiser might ask a measurement vendor to help figure out
                     the impact its ads on Facebook have had on sales. The measurement vendor
                     compares information from us about clicks on the advertiser’s Facebook ads
                     with information from the advertiser about product purchases. Then the
                     measurement vendor creates and provides aggregated reports that show the
                     advertiser how its ads are performing.



                     Marketing vendors

                     We share information about you with marketing vendors[61]. For example, we
                     share your device identifier or other identifiers with marketing vendors to help
                     us serve you ads most relevant to your interests.

                     Marketing vendors support our marketing and advertising efforts by:

                         Serving our advertisements across the internet, including on mobile, desktop
                         and connected television devices

                         Tracking and categorizing your online and mobile app activity

                         Providing us information about your interests and community and advertising
                         interactions

                     These marketing vendors help us understand who might find our advertising
                     most relevant to their interests, and which of our Products might interest you.
                     This information can be used to personalize which of our ads are shown to you.
                     Marketing vendors also use this information to measure response to our
                     marketing efforts and the effectiveness of our advertising.

                     Learn more[62] about how to manage the Meta ads you see off our Products.



                  Service providers
https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 56 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Service providers
                     Service providers provide services to us that help us provide our Products to
                     you. We share the information we have about you to receive these services,
                     which include:

                         Investigating suspicious activity

                         Detecting and stopping threats to our personnel and property

                         Facilitating payments

                         Providing customer support

                         Improving the functionality of our Products

                         Providing technical infrastructure services

                         Analyzing how our Products are used

                         Conducting research and surveys

                         Marketing and promoting our Products



                  Third parties

                     External researchers
                     We provide information to external researchers. They use it to conduct
                     research that advances scholarship and innovation, and to promote safety,
                     security and integrity.

                     Research goals include supporting:

                         Our business or mission

                         Social good. Learn more.

                         Technological advancement

                         Safety and security on our Products

                         Public interest

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 57 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                         Health and well-being

                     When sharing information with external researchers, we ensure the privacy of
                     our users is protected. Learn more about the privacy-safe research we support.



                  Other third parties

                  We also share information with other third parties[54] in response to legal requests,
                  to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm. Read the policy.

                  And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases
                  we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the
                  law allows.


                     53


                     Partner
                     A person, business, organization or body using or integrating our Products to
                     advertise, market or support their products and services



                     54


                     Third party
                     A person, business, organization or body that is not part of the Meta
                     Companies



                     55


                     General demographics and interests
                     For example, a bike shop creates a Page on Facebook and wants to place an
                     ad to reach an audience of people in Atlanta interested in cycling. We
                     determine whether someone fits in this audience based on, for example,


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 58 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     whether they liked a Page about bikes. Then people in that audience could see
                     the bike shop's ad.

                     You can see the “interests” assigned to you in your ad preferences and remove
                     them if you want.

                     The bike shop can then see reports showing aggregated statistics about the
                     audience seeing their ads and how their ads are performing. The reports would
                     show statistics to the advertiser that, for example, most of the people who saw
                     or clicked on their ad:

                          Were women

                          Were between the ages of 25 and 34

                          Clicked on the ad from their phone



                     56


                     When you might give us permission
                     For example, you might request more information from a business by clicking
                     their ad in your Facebook Feed and submitting a form with your name and
                     contact information. Then the advertiser would receive the information you
                     provided.



                     57


                     What Products does this policy cover?




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 59 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                         Facebook

                         Messenger

                         Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                         Facebook Portal products

                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                         Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                         Shops

                         Marketplace

                         Spark AR

                         Meta Business Tools

                         Meta Audience Network

                         Facebook View

                         Meta Pay

                         Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[63] that adds to

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 60 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                         9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     the information provided in this policy.



                     58


                     Transactions you might make
                          Subscribing to premium content

                          Buying, selling or using products

                          Buying, selling or using services

                          Donating to charities



                     59


                     Commerce services platforms
                     Commerce services platforms provide a range of commerce services,
                     including:

                          Payments

                          Marketing

                          Shipping

                          Customer engagement tools



                     60


                     Measurement vendor
                     A third party that creates reports to help advertisers understand how their
                     content and ads are performing. These reports also measure whether people
                     took an action after seeing an ad.



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                Page 61 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                   9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     61


                     Marketing vendor
                     A third party that helps market or advertise Meta and our Products, measures
                     the effectiveness of our own marketing campaigns and performs advertising
                     research



                     62


                     Manage the ads you see on our Products
                     Visit your ad preferences.


                     Manage Meta ads you see off our Products
                     We advertise our own products and services on non-Meta ad platforms. We
                     use marketing vendors to deliver these ads. Here’s how to opt out of our
                     tailored ads you see off our Products:

                          Cookie-based opt out: If applicable and available in your jurisdiction, you
                          may use the Digital Advertising Alliance industry opt-out platform, available
                          in English and Spanish. Residents of Canada may use the Digital
                          Advertising Alliance of Canada industry opt-out platform. If you apply certain
                          ad blockers and tools to restrict cookies, it may interfere with your ability to
                          opt out.

                          Mobile phone-based opt out: Check your mobile device settings. Different
                          manufacturers provide different ways to opt out of advertisements.

                          Other online identifiers: You may use the NAI industry opt-out platform.



                     63


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                          Page 62 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board



                  How do the Meta Companies work together?

                     Highlights

                         Meta owns Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, Portal and the other Products
                         covered by this policy

                         Meta also owns the Meta Companies, which include WhatsApp

                         Sometimes we share information within these Companies

                         We do this to make new features or shared experiences between different
                         products. Then you can do things like use WhatsApp to chat on Portal.

                         We also share information, like your name and email address, to help verify
                         your accounts, and check out suspicious activities. This helps us keep your
                         accounts safe.




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 63 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  We are part of the Meta Companies that provide Meta Company Products. Meta
                  Company Products include all the Meta Products[64] covered by this Policy, plus
                  other products like WhatsApp, Novi and more.

                  We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the
                  other Meta Companies. Learn more about how we transfer information to other
                  countries.

                  We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies,
                  according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some
                  cases, Meta acts as a service provider[65] for other Meta Companies. We act on
                  their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.


                  Why we share across the Meta Companies
                  Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:

                     To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws

                     To personalize offers, ads and other sponsored or commercial content

                     To develop and provide features and integrations

                     To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products


                  See some examples[66] of why we share.




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 64 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  More resources

                    Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
                    Facebook Help Center



                     64


                     What Products does this policy cover?




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                          Facebook

                          Messenger

                          Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                          Facebook Portal products

                          Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                          Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                          Shops

                          Marketplace

                          Spark AR



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 65 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Meta Business Tools

                          Meta Audience Network

                          Facebook View

                          Meta Pay

                          Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[67] that adds to
                     the information provided in this policy.



                     65


                     Service provider
                     A person, business, organization or body that provides services to Meta or to
                     our users on behalf of Meta. For example, our service providers do things like
                     investigate suspicious activity and provide customer support.



                     66


                     Why we share across the Meta Companies
                     Promoting safety, security and integrity and complying with applicable
                     law

                     For example, we share information with Meta Companies that provide financial
                     products and services to help them promote safety, security and integrity and
                     comply with applicable law. This includes:

                          Complying with their legal obligations

                          Helping keep you and others safe

                          Performing account verification

                          Investigating suspicious activities


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 66 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Creating analytics

                     For these purposes, we might share your name, email address, who you’re
                     friends with and other account information within the Meta Companies.

                     Developing and providing features and integrations

                     For example, where available in your country, you can choose to use certain
                     integrations that connect your WhatsApp experiences with other Meta
                     Company Products. These integrations let you do things like:

                          Use your Meta Pay account to pay for things on WhatsApp

                          Chat with your friends on other Meta Company Products, such as Portal, by
                          connecting your WhatsApp account

                     We also share information with Meta Companies to support innovation. For
                     example, your videos can help train our products to recognize objects, like
                     trees, or activities, like when a dog chases a ball. They can also help train tools
                     that let people and businesses create content, like images and videos. This
                     technology is used to help us offer new products or features in the future.

                     Understanding how people use our products

                     We count the number of unique users, monthly active users and daily active
                     users on our products. This information helps us understand the community
                     using our products and publicly share important trends about how our products
                     are used.



                     67


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 67 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board



                  How can you manage or delete your information
                  and exercise your rights?

                     Highlights

                         You have rights to view and download the information we have about you

                         You can use the settings in this section to manage your privacy

                         You also can delete your account or specific account information, if you want
                         to



                  We offer you a variety of tools to view, manage, download and delete your
                  information below. You can also manage your information by visiting the settings of
                  the Products you use. You may also have other privacy rights under applicable laws.

                  To exercise your rights, visit our Help Centers, your settings for Facebook and
                  Instagram and your device-based settings.


                  Take a privacy checkup

                                  Take a privacy checkup
                                  Be guided through Facebook privacy settings



                  View and manage your information

                            Access your information


                            Off-Facebook activity


                            Ad preferences [68]

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 68 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                   9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                            Manage your data



                  Port, download or delete your information

                            Port your information [69]


                            Download your information


                            Delete your information or account [70]


                  You can learn more about how privacy works on Facebook and on Instagram, and in
                  the Facebook Help Center. If you have questions about this policy, you can contact
                  us as described below. In some countries, you may also be able to contact the Data
                  Protection Officer for Meta Platforms, Inc., and depending on your jurisdiction, you
                  may also contact your local Data Protection Authority (“DPA”) directly.


                     68


                     Manage the ads you see on our Products
                     Visit your ad preferences.


                     Manage Meta ads you see off our Products
                     We advertise our own products and services on non-Meta ad platforms. We
                     use marketing vendors to deliver these ads. Here’s how to opt out of our
                     tailored ads you see off our Products:

                          Cookie-based opt out: If applicable and available in your jurisdiction, you
                          may use the Digital Advertising Alliance industry opt-out platform, available
                          in English and Spanish. Residents of Canada may use the Digital
                          Advertising Alliance of Canada industry opt-out platform. If you apply certain
                          ad blockers and tools to restrict cookies, it may interfere with your ability to
                          opt out.

                          Mobile phone-based opt out: Check your mobile device settings. Different
                          manufacturers provide different ways to opt out of advertisements.

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                          Page 69 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Other online identifiers: You may use the NAI industry opt-out platform.



                     69


                     Port your information
                     In certain cases and subject to applicable law, you have the right to port your
                     information.



                     70


                     Delete your information or account
                     To delete your information, you can:

                          Find and delete specific information. We offer tools you can use to delete
                          certain information. For example, you can use Delete buttons to delete
                          content you’ve posted to your account. You can also use tools like activity
                          log on Facebook to send content to the trash in bulk. When you delete
                          content, it’s no longer visible to other users. Visit the Facebook Help Center
                          or Instagram Help Center to learn what happens when you delete your
                          content or move it to trash.

                          Permanently delete your account. If you delete your account on Facebook
                          or Instagram, we delete your information, including the things you’ve posted,
                          such as your photos and status updates, unless we need to keep it as
                          described in "How long do we keep your information?" Once your account is
                          permanently deleted you won’t be able to reactivate it, and you won’t be able
                          to retrieve information, including content you’ve posted.

                     How long does it take to delete your information?

                     If you request that we delete your account or content, it may take up to 90 days
                     to delete your information after we begin the account deletion process or
                     receive a content deletion request. After the information is deleted, it may take
                     us up to another 90 days to remove it from backups and disaster recovery.

                     If you leave your deleted content in your trash on Facebook or your Recently
                     Deleted folder on Instagram, the deletion process will begin automatically in 30

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 70 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                   9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     days. Or you can start the deletion process right away by deleting the content
                     from your trash or Recently Deleted folder.



                  How long do we keep your information?

                     Highlights

                         We keep information for as long as we need it to provide a feature or service

                         But you can request that we delete your information

                         We’ll delete that information unless we have to keep it for something else,
                         like for legal reasons



                  We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with
                  legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need
                  information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:

                     If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep
                     some of your information to maintain your account. Learn more[71].

                     The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages
                     sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular
                     messages. Learn more[72].

                     How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal
                     obligations. See some examples[73].

                     If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate
                     possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity;
                     or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products

                  In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended
                  period of time. Read our policy[74] about when we may preserve your information.


                     71


                     If we need it to operate or provide our Products
https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                          Page 71 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     For example, we keep profile information, photos you’ve posted (and not
                     deleted) and security information for the lifetime of your account.

                     And when you search for something on Facebook, we keep your search history
                     until you clear the search in your activity log or delete your account. Once you
                     clear a search or delete your account, it will no longer be visible to you, and it
                     will be deleted[75].

                     But even if you don’t clear your search or delete your account, within six
                     months of your search we delete information about that search that isn’t
                     necessary to show you your search history, like information about the device
                     you were using, or your location.



                     72


                          The feature we use it for, and how that feature works




                          For example, May is planning a surprise party for Yang. She sends
                          Cynthia the party details in Messenger using vanish mode so that
                          the message will disappear. The message will no longer be visible to
                          May once she leaves the chat, and Cynthia will see the message only
                          the first time she opens the chat thread.

                          After Cynthia reads the message, the content is deleted after one
                          hour. If Cynthia never reads it, it’s deleted after 14 days.




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 72 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                   9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     73


                     How long we need to retain the information to comply
                     with certain legal obligations
                     For example, we retain information for as long as we need it for:

                          A legal request or obligation, including obligations of Meta Companies or to
                          comply with applicable law

                          A governmental investigation

                          A legal claim, complaint, litigation or regulatory proceedings



                     74


                     Why we may preserve your information longer
                     Your information, including financial transaction data related to purchases or
                     money transfers made on our Products, may be preserved and accessed for a
                     longer time period if it’s related to any of the following:

                          A legal request or obligation, including obligations of Meta Companies or to
                          comply with applicable law

                          A governmental investigation

                          An investigation of possible violations of our terms or policies

                          To prevent harm

                          For safety, security and integrity purposes

                          To protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products

                          If it’s needed in relation to a legal claim, complaint, litigation or regulatory
                          proceedings


                     See some examples[76].



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                          Page 73 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                 9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     In some cases, we may preserve your information based on the above reasons
                     even after you request deletion of your account or some of your content. We
                     may also preserve information from accounts that have been disabled and
                     content that has been removed for violations of our terms and policies.



                     75


                     Delete your information or account
                     To delete your information, you can:

                          Find and delete specific information. We offer tools you can use to delete
                          certain information. For example, you can use Delete buttons to delete
                          content you’ve posted to your account. You can also use tools like activity
                          log on Facebook to send content to the trash in bulk. When you delete
                          content, it’s no longer visible to other users. Visit the Facebook Help Center
                          or Instagram Help Center to learn what happens when you delete your
                          content or move it to trash.

                          Permanently delete your account. If you delete your account on Facebook
                          or Instagram, we delete your information, including the things you’ve posted,
                          such as your photos and status updates, unless we need to keep it as
                          described in "How long do we keep your information?" Once your account is
                          permanently deleted you won’t be able to reactivate it, and you won’t be able
                          to retrieve information, including content you’ve posted.

                     How long does it take to delete your information?

                     If you request that we delete your account or content, it may take up to 90 days
                     to delete your information after we begin the account deletion process or
                     receive a content deletion request. After the information is deleted, it may take
                     us up to another 90 days to remove it from backups and disaster recovery.

                     If you leave your deleted content in your trash on Facebook or your Recently
                     Deleted folder on Instagram, the deletion process will begin automatically in 30
                     days. Or you can start the deletion process right away by deleting the content
                     from your trash or Recently Deleted folder.



                     76

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                        Page 74 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Examples of why we might preserve your information
                     To respond to a legal request

                     For example, we might preserve your information after you delete your account
                     when we receive a valid legal request, such as a preservation order or search
                     warrant, related to your account.

                     To comply with applicable law

                     For example, we preserve certain information about purchases or transactions
                     associated with an account, in line with Meta’s accounting obligations.

                     For safety, security and integrity purposes

                     For example, if we disable an account for violating our terms or policies, we
                     preserve information about that user to prevent them from opening a new
                     account.

                     We also might preserve some of your account information as part of our review
                     of suspicious activity. This includes any suspicious activity associated with our
                     financial products, like suspected money laundering or terrorist funding.

                     For litigation

                     We may preserve your information where we deem it necessary for reasons
                     related to a legal claim or complaint. For example, we may be required to
                     defend ourselves in legal proceedings in a claim related to your information.



                  How do we transfer information?

                     Highlights

                         Because we connect people all around the world, we need to transfer
                         information all around the world, too

                         When we do this, we follow international regulations to keep your information
                         safe




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 75 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Why is information transferred to other countries?
                     We share the information we collect globally, both internally across our offices
                     and data centers, and externally with our partners[77], measurement
                     vendors[78], service providers[79] and other third parties[80]. Because Meta is
                     global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are
                     necessary for a variety of reasons, including:

                         So we can operate and provide the services stated in the terms of the Meta
                         Product[81] you’re using and this Policy. This includes allowing you to share
                         information and connect with your family and friends around the globe.

                         So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products




                     Where is information transferred?
                     Your information will be transferred or transmitted to, or stored and processed
                     in:

                         Places we have infrastructure or data centers, including the United States,
                         Ireland, Denmark and Sweden, among others

                         Countries where Meta Company Products are available

                         Other countries where our partners, vendors, service providers and other
                         third parties are located outside of the country where you live, for purposes
                         as described in this Policy




                     How do we safeguard your information?

                     We rely on appropriate mechanisms[82] for international data transfers.

                     We also make sure that appropriate safeguards are in place whenever we
                     transfer your information. For example, we encrypt your information when it’s in
                     transit over public networks to protect it from unauthorized access.

                     More resources




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 76 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                        How information is safeguarded as it’s transferred
                        Facebook Newsroom




                     77


                     Partner
                     A person, business, organization or body using or integrating our Products to
                     advertise, market or support their products and services



                     78


                     Measurement vendor
                     A third party that creates reports to help advertisers understand how their
                     content and ads are performing. These reports also measure whether people
                     took an action after seeing an ad.



                     79


                     Service provider
                     A person, business, organization or body that provides services to Meta or to
                     our users on behalf of Meta. For example, our service providers do things like
                     investigate suspicious activity and provide customer support.



                     80


                     Third party
                     A person, business, organization or body that is not part of the Meta
                     Companies


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 77 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     81


                     What Products does this policy cover?




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                          Facebook

                          Messenger

                          Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                          Facebook Portal products

                          Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                          Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                          Shops

                          Marketplace

                          Spark AR

                          Meta Business Tools

                          Meta Audience Network

                          Facebook View


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 78 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Meta Pay

                          Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[83] that adds to
                     the information provided in this policy.



                     82


                     Mechanisms we use for global data transfers
                     We rely on appropriate mechanisms for international data transfers. For
                     example, for information we collect:

                          We utilize standard contractual clauses approved by the European
                          Commission and by other relevant authorities.

                          We rely on determinations from the European Commission, and from other
                          relevant authorities, about whether other countries have adequate levels of
                          data protection.

                          We use equivalent mechanisms under applicable laws that apply to data
                          transfers to the United States and other relevant countries.



                     83


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 79 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                  How do we respond to legal requests, comply
                  with applicable law and prevent harm?

                     Highlights

                         Sometimes we have to provide information to respond to legal requests
                         when necessary

                         If there’s a law that says we need to keep your information for some reason,
                         we need to comply with it. So we’ll keep information to obey that law.

                         We also sometimes keep information that we think will help prevent or stop
                         bad activity, either on our Products or in the world



                  We access, preserve, use and share your information:

                     In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production
                     orders or subpoenas. These requests come from third parties[84] such as civil
                     litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities. Learn more[85] about
                     when we respond to legal requests.

                     In accordance with applicable law

                     To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta Products[86], users,
                     employees, property and the public. Learn more[87].

                  We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time. Learn
                  more[88].


                     84


                     Third party
                     A person, business, organization or body that is not part of the Meta
                     Companies



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 80 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     85


                     When we respond to legal requests
                     We respond to legal requests where we’re required by law to do so, and at
                     times where we're not compelled by law, but a response:

                          May affect users in that jurisdiction, and

                          Is consistent with internationally recognized standards including, for
                          example, our Corporate Human Rights Policy.

                     Learn more about government requests and how we’ve responded.



                     86


                     What Products does this policy cover?




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                          Facebook

                          Messenger

                          Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 81 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Facebook Portal products

                          Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                          Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                          Shops

                          Marketplace

                          Spark AR

                          Meta Business Tools

                          Meta Audience Network

                          Facebook View

                          Meta Pay

                          Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[89] that adds to
                     the information provided in this policy.



                     87


                     How we promote safety, security and integrity
                     We share your information with law enforcement, government authorities, Meta
                     Companies and other third parties (including industry peers) when we have a
                     good faith belief it’s necessary to detect, prevent and address a variety of
                     situations, such as:


                          Unauthorized use of our Products. See an example.[90]

                          Violations of our terms and policies. See an example.[91]

                          Investigating suspicious activity

                          Protecting ourselves, including our rights, property, personnel or Products

                          Preventing abuse, fraud, or other harmful or illegal activity, on and off our

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                       Page 82 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                                   9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                          Products

                          Protecting you or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory
                          inquiries

                          Emergency situations, such as risk of death or imminent bodily harm



                     88


                     Why we may preserve your information longer
                     Your information, including financial transaction data related to purchases or
                     money transfers made on our Products, may be preserved and accessed for a
                     longer time period if it’s related to any of the following:

                          A legal request or obligation, including obligations of Meta Companies or to
                          comply with applicable law

                          A governmental investigation

                          An investigation of possible violations of our terms or policies

                          To prevent harm

                          For safety, security and integrity purposes

                          To protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products

                          If it’s needed in relation to a legal claim, complaint, litigation or regulatory
                          proceedings


                     See some examples[92].

                     In some cases, we may preserve your information based on the above reasons
                     even after you request deletion of your account or some of your content. We
                     may also preserve information from accounts that have been disabled and
                     content that has been removed for violations of our terms and policies.



                     89



https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                          Page 83 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board




                     90


                     Unauthorized use of our Products
                     For example, if you unlawfully collect and use Facebook user data, we may
                     share your information to defend ourselves against claims or in litigation.



                     91


                     Violations of our terms and policies
                     For example, if you post threatening or harmful content, we may share your
                     information across the Meta Companies to protect ourselves and others. This
                     can include blocking your access to certain features or disabling your account
                     across the Meta Companies.



                     92


                     Examples of why we might preserve your information
                     To respond to a legal request

                     For example, we might preserve your information after you delete your account

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 84 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     when we receive a valid legal request, such as a preservation order or search
                     warrant, related to your account.

                     To comply with applicable law

                     For example, we preserve certain information about purchases or transactions
                     associated with an account, in line with Meta’s accounting obligations.

                     For safety, security and integrity purposes

                     For example, if we disable an account for violating our terms or policies, we
                     preserve information about that user to prevent them from opening a new
                     account.

                     We also might preserve some of your account information as part of our review
                     of suspicious activity. This includes any suspicious activity associated with our
                     financial products, like suspected money laundering or terrorist funding.

                     For litigation

                     We may preserve your information where we deem it necessary for reasons
                     related to a legal claim or complaint. For example, we may be required to
                     defend ourselves in legal proceedings in a claim related to your information.



                  How will you know the policy has changed?
                  We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the
                  opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our
                  Products.


                  Privacy notice for United States residents
                  You can learn more about the consumer privacy rights that may be available to you
                  by reviewing the United States Regional Privacy Notice.


                  How to contact Meta with questions
                  You can learn more about how privacy works on Facebook and on Instagram and in
                  the Facebook Help Center. If you have questions about this Policy or have
                  questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                      Page 85 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                  described below.

                  You can contact us online or by mail at:

                  Meta Platforms, Inc.
                  ATTN: Privacy Operations
                  1601 Willow Road
                  Menlo Park, CA 94025


                  Why and how we process your information
                  The categories of information we use, and why and how information is processed,
                  are set out below:



                                                                Information categories we use
                                                                 (see 'What Information do we
                                                               collect?' for more information on
                            Why and how we process your         each information category) The
                                    information                    actual information we use
                                                                    depends on your factual
                                                               circumstances, but could include
                                                                      any of the following:




                    Personalizing the Meta Products[93]        Your activity and information you
                    (other than ads, see below): Our           provide:
                    systems automatically process
                                                                 Content you create, like posts,
                    information we collect and store
                                                                 comments or audio
                    associated with you and others to
                    assess and understand your interests         Content you provide through
                    and your preferences and provide you         our camera feature or your
                    personalized experiences across the          camera roll settings, or through
                    Meta Products in accordance with our         our voice-enabled features
                    terms. This is how we:
                                                                 Metadata[94] about content
                       Personalize features and content
                       (such as your News Feed, Instagram        Types of content you view or
                       Feed and Stories);                        interact with, and how you
                                                                 interact with it
                       Make suggestions for you (such as

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 86 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                       people you may know, groups or             Apps and features you use,
                       events that you may be interested in       and what actions you take in
                       or topics that you may want to follow)     them
                       on and off our products.
                                                                  Purchases or other
                    Learn more about how we use                   transactions you make
                    information about you to personalize
                    your experience on and across Meta            Hashtags you use
                    Products and how we choose the ads            The time, frequency and
                    that you see.                                 duration of your activities on
                                                                  our Products

                                                                Friends, followers and other
                                                                connections

                                                                App, browser and device
                                                                information:

                                                                  Device[95] characteristics and
                                                                  device software

                                                                  What you’re doing on your
                                                                  device, like whether our app is
                                                                  in the foreground or if your
                                                                  mouse is moving (which can
                                                                  help tell humans from bots)

                                                                  Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                  apart from other users’

                                                                  Device signals

                                                                  Information you’ve shared
                                                                  through your device settings
                                                                  (like GPS location)

                                                                  Location-related information

                                                                  Information about the network
                                                                  you connect your device to

                                                                  Reports about our products’
                                                                  performance on your device

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 87 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                 Information from cookies and
                                                                 similar technologies

                                                               Information from partners,
                                                               vendors and third parties



                    Providing ads on the Meta Products:        Your activity and information you
                    Our systems automatically process          provide:
                    limited categories of information that
                    we've collected and stored to provide        Age
                    you with ads on the Meta Products in
                    accordance with our terms.                   The gender you provide

                                                                 Information about ads we show
                                                                 you and how you engage with
                                                                 those ads

                                                               App, browser and device
                                                               information:

                                                                 Location information

                                                                 Device characteristics and
                                                                 device software



                    Providing and improving our Meta           Your activity and information you
                    Products: The provision of the Meta        provide:
                    Products includes collecting, storing,
                    and, where relevant, sharing, profiling,     Content you create, like posts,
                    reviewing and curating, and in some          comments or audio
                    instances not only automated
                    processing but also manual (human)           Your public profile information
                    reviewing, to:                               (including your name,
                                                                 username and profile picture)
                       Create and maintain your account          Content you provide through
                       and profile,                              our camera feature or your
                       Connect your Meta Products account,       camera roll settings, or through
                                                                 our voice-enabled features
                       including your public profile
                       information, to an integrated partner     Messages you send and

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 88 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                       to sign in or share your information,      receive, including their content,
                                                                  subject to applicable law
                       Facilitate the sharing of content and
                       status,                                    Metadata about content and
                                                                  messages, subject to
                       Provide and curate features,               applicable law

                       Provide messaging services, the            Types of content you view or
                       ability to make voice and video calls      interact with, and how you
                       and connect with others,                   interact with it

                       Provide advertising products,              Apps and features you use,
                                                                  and what actions you take in
                       Understand and enable creation of          them
                       content like text, images and videos,
                       and                                        Purchases or other
                                                                  transactions you make,
                       Undertake analytics.                       including truncated credit card
                                                                  information
                    We also use information to develop,
                    research and test improvements to our         Hashtags you use
                    Products. We use information we have
                    to:                                           The time, frequency and
                                                                  duration of your activities on
                       See if a product is working correctly,     our Products

                       Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not,   Friends, followers and other
                                                                connections
                       Test out new products and features to
                       see if they work,
                                                                App, browser and device
                                                                information:
                       Get feedback on our ideas for
                       products or features, and                  Device characteristics and
                       Conduct surveys and other research         device software
                       about what you like about our              What you’re doing on your
                       Products and brands and what we            device, like whether our app is
                       can do better.                             in the foreground or if your
                                                                  mouse is moving (which can
                                                                  help tell humans from bots)

                                                                  Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                  apart from other users’


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 89 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                  Device signals

                                                                  Information you’ve shared
                                                                  through your device settings

                                                                  Location-related information

                                                                  Information about the network
                                                                  you connect your device to,
                                                                  including your IP address[96]

                                                                  Information from cookies and
                                                                  similar technologies

                                                                Information from partners,
                                                                vendors and third parties



                    Promoting safety, integrity and security    Your activity and information you
                    on and across the Meta Products: The        provide::
                    Meta Products are designed to research
                    and help ensure the safety, integrity and     Content you create, like posts,
                    security of those services and those          comments or audio
                    people who enjoy them, on and off Meta
                                                                  Content you provide through
                    Products. We process information we
                                                                  our camera feature or your
                    have associated with you and apply
                                                                  camera roll settings, or through
                    automated processing techniques and,
                                                                  our voice-enabled features
                    in some instances, conduct manual
                    (human) review to:                            Messages you send and
                                                                  receive, including their content,
                       Verify accounts and activity,              subject to applicable law
                       Find and address violations of our         Metadata about content and
                       terms or policies. In some cases, the      messages, subject to
                       decisions we make about violations         applicable law
                       are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
                                                                  Types of content you view or
                       Investigate suspicious activity,           interact with, and how you
                       Detect, prevent and combat harmful         interact with it
                       or unlawful behavior, such as to
                                                                  Apps and features you use,
                       review and, in some cases, remove          and what actions you take in
                       content reported to us,

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 90 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                       Identify and combat disparities and         them
                       racial bias against historically
                       marginalized communities,                   Purchases or other
                                                                   transactions you make,
                       Protect the life, physical or mental        including truncated credit card
                       health, well-being or integrity of our      information
                       users or others,
                                                                   Hashtags you use
                       Detect and prevent spam, other
                       security matters and other bad              The time, frequency and
                       experiences,                                duration of your activities on
                                                                   our Products
                       Detect and stop threats to our
                       personnel and property, and               Friends, followers and other
                                                                 connections
                       Maintain the integrity of our Products.
                                                                 App, browser and device
                    For more information on safety, integrity    information:
                    and security generally on Meta
                    Products, visit the Facebook Security          Device characteristics and
                    Help Center and Instagram Security             device software
                    Tips.
                                                                   What you’re doing on your
                                                                   device, like whether our app is
                                                                   in the foreground or if your
                                                                   mouse is moving (which can
                                                                   help tell humans from bots)

                                                                   Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                   apart from other users’

                                                                   Device signals

                                                                   Information you’ve shared
                                                                   through your device settings

                                                                   Location-related information

                                                                   Information about the network
                                                                   you connect your device to,
                                                                   including your IP address

                                                                   Information from cookies and
                                                                   similar technologies


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 91 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                  Information from partners,
                                                                  vendors and third parties



                    To communicate with you: We use               Your activity and information you
                    information you’ve given us (like contact     provide:
                    information on your profile) to send you
                    a communication, like an e-mail or in-          Contact information on your
                    product notice, for example:                    profile and your
                                                                    communications with us
                       We’ll contact you via email or in-
                       product notifications in relation to the     Content you create, like posts,
                       Meta Products, product-related               comments or audio
                       issues, research or to let you know          Content you provide through
                       about our terms and policies.                our camera feature or your
                                                                    camera roll settings, or through
                    We also use contact information like            our voice-enabled features
                    your email address to respond when
                    you contact us.                               App, browser and device
                                                                  information:

                                                                    Device characteristics and
                                                                    device software

                                                                    What you’re doing on your
                                                                    device, like whether our app is
                                                                    in the foreground or if your
                                                                    mouse is moving (which can
                                                                    help tell humans from bots)

                                                                    Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                    apart from other users’

                                                                    Device signals

                                                                    Information you’ve shared
                                                                    through your device settings

                                                                    Location-related information

                                                                    Information about the network
                                                                    you connect your device to,
                                                                    including your IP address
https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 92 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                                                                 Information from cookies and
                                                                 similar technologies.




                    Transferring, storing or processing your   Your activity and information you
                    information across borders, including      provide:
                    from and to the United States and other
                    countries: We share information we           Content you create, like posts,
                    collect globally, both internally across     comments or audio
                    our offices and data centers and
                                                                 Content you provide through
                    externally with our partners[97], third      our camera feature or your
                    parties[98] and service providers[99].       camera roll settings, or through
                    Because Meta is global, with users,          our voice-enabled features
                    partners, vendors and employees
                    around the world, transfers are              Metadata about content and
                    necessary:                                   messages, subject to
                                                                 applicable law
                       To operate and provide the services
                                                                 Types of content you view or
                       described in the terms that apply to
                                                                 interact with, and how you
                       the Meta Product(s) you are using.
                                                                 interact with it
                       This includes allowing you to share
                       information and connect with your         Apps and features you use,
                       family and friends around the globe;      and what actions you take in
                       and                                       them
                       To fix, analyze and improve our
                                                                 Purchases or other
                       Products.                                 transactions you make,
                                                                 including truncated credit card
                    For more information, see the "How do        information
                    we transfer information?" section of the
                    Meta Privacy Policy.                         Hashtags you use

                                                                 The time, frequency and
                                                                 duration of your activities on
                                                                 our Products

                                                               Friends, followers and other
                                                               connections

                                                               App, browser and device

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 93 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                              9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                 information:

                                                                   Device characteristics and
                                                                   device software

                                                                   What you’re doing on your
                                                                   device, like whether our app is
                                                                   in the foreground or if your
                                                                   mouse is moving (which can
                                                                   help tell humans from bots)

                                                                   Identifiers that tell your advice
                                                                   apart from other users’

                                                                   Device signals

                                                                   Information you’ve shared
                                                                   through your device settings

                                                                   Location-related information

                                                                   Information about the network
                                                                   you connect your device to,
                                                                   including your IP address

                                                                   Information from cookies and
                                                                   similar technologies

                                                                 Information from partners,
                                                                 vendors and third parties



                    Processing information subject to            Your activity and information you
                    special protections under applicable         provide:
                    laws that you provide so we can share it
                    with those you choose, to provide,             Any information with special
                    personalize and improve our Products           protections that you choose to
                    and to undertake analytics. We’ll collect,     provide, such as your religious
                    store, publish and apply automated, or         views, your sexual orientation,
                    sometimes manual (human), processing           political views, health, racial or
                    for these purposes.                            ethnic origin, philosophical
                                                                   beliefs or trade union
                                                                   membership, or as part of

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 94 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                  surveys you choose to
                                                                  participate in, and where you
                                                                  have given your explicit
                                                                  consent



                    Receiving and using information from        Your activity and information you
                    third parties to tailor the ads you see:    provide:
                    We’ll use information that advertisers,
                    businesses and other partners provide         Information and content you
                    us about activity off Meta Products that      provide, such as your name or
                    we have associated with you to                email address
                    personalize ads that we show you on
                    Meta Products, and on websites, apps        Information from partners,
                    and devices that use our advertising        vendors and third parties
                    services. We receive this information
                    whether or not you’re logged in or have
                    an account on our Products. See the
                    Cookies Policy for more information.



                    Sharing your contact, profile or other      Your activity and information you
                    information with third parties upon your    provide:
                    request: The type of third party and
                    categories of information shared              Information such as your
                    depend on the circumstances of what           contact or profile information
                    you ask us to share. For example:
                                                                  Content you create, like posts
                       We share your email (or other contact      or comments
                       information) or other information you
                       might choose when you direct us to
                       share it with an advertiser so they
                       can contact you with additional
                       information about a promoted
                       product, and

                       If you choose to integrate other apps,
                       games or websites with Meta
                       Products and log in, we’ll share your
                       information with the app, game or
                       website to log you in.

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 95 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                    Providing measurement, analytics and         Your activity and information you
                    business services:                           provide:

                    Our systems automatically, as well as          Content you create, like posts,
                    with some manual (human) processing,           comments or audio
                    process information we have collected
                    and stored about you and others. We            Content you provide through
                    use this information to:                       our camera feature or your
                                                                   camera roll settings, or through
                       Provide insights and measurement            our voice-enabled features
                       reports to businesses, advertisers          Types of content you view or
                       and other partners to help them             interact with, and how you
                       measure the effectiveness and               interact with it
                       distribution of their or their clients’
                       ads, content and services, to               Apps and features you use,
                       understand the kinds of people who          and what actions you take in
                       are seeing their content and ads, and       them
                       how their content and ads are
                       performing on and off Meta Products,        Purchases or other
                       and                                         transactions you make

                       Provide aggregated user analytics           Hashtags you use
                       and insights reports that help
                       businesses, advertisers and other           The time, frequency and
                       partners better understand the              duration of your activities on
                       audiences with whom they may want           our Products
                       to connect, as well as the types of
                       people who use their services and         Friends, followers and other
                       how people interact with their            connections
                       websites, apps and services.
                                                                 App, browser and device
                                                                 information:

                                                                   Device characteristics and
                                                                   device software

                                                                   What you’re doing on your
                                                                   device, like whether our app is
                                                                   in the foreground or if your
                                                                   mouse is moving (which can
                                                                   help tell humans from bots)

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 96 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                apart from other users

                                                                Device signals

                                                                Information you’ve shared
                                                                through your device settings

                                                                Location-related information

                                                                Information about the network
                                                                you connect your device to,
                                                                including your IP address

                                                                Information from cookies and
                                                                similar technologies



                    Sharing of information across the Meta    Your activity and information you
                    Companies:                                provide:

                       To provide a seamless, consistent        Content you create, like posts,
                       and richer, innovative experience        comments or audio
                       across the Meta Company Products
                       to enable cross app interactions,        Content you provide through
                       sharing, viewing and engaging with       our camera feature or your
                       content, including posts and videos.     camera roll settings, or through
                                                                our voice-enabled features

                                                                Metadata about content

                                                                Types of content you view or
                                                                interact with, and how you
                                                                interact with it

                                                                Apps and features you use,
                                                                and what actions you take in
                                                                them

                                                                Purchases or other
                                                                transactions you make

                                                                Hashtags you use


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 97 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                The time, frequency and
                                                                duration of your activities on
                                                                our Products

                                                              Friends, followers and other
                                                              connections

                                                              App, browser and device
                                                              information:

                                                                Device characteristics and
                                                                device software

                                                                What you’re doing on your
                                                                device, like whether our app is
                                                                in the foreground or if your
                                                                mouse is moving (which can
                                                                help tell humans from bots)

                                                                Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                apart from other users'

                                                                Device signals

                                                                Information you’ve shared
                                                                through your device settings

                                                                Location-related information

                                                                Information about the network
                                                                you connect your device to,
                                                                including your IP address

                                                                Information from cookies and
                                                                similar technologies



                    Business intelligence and analytics:      Your activity and information you
                                                              provide:
                       To understand, in aggregate, your
                       usage of and across our Products, to     Content you create, like posts,
                       accurately count people and              comments or audio
                       businesses; and
                                                                Content you provide through

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 98 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                       To validate metrics directly related to     our camera feature or your
                       these, in order to inform and improve       camera roll settings, or through
                       product direction and development           our voice-enabled features
                       and to adhere to
                       (shareholder/earning) reporting             Metadata about content and
                       obligations.                                messages, subject to
                                                                   applicable law

                                                                   Types of content you view or
                                                                   interact with, and how you
                                                                   interact with it

                                                                   Apps and features you use,
                                                                   and what actions you take in
                                                                   them

                                                                   Purchases or other
                                                                   transactions you make

                                                                   Hashtags you use

                                                                   The time, frequency and
                                                                   duration of your activities on
                                                                   our Products

                                                                 Friends, followers and other
                                                                 connections

                                                                 App, browser and device
                                                                 information:

                                                                   Device characteristics and
                                                                   device software

                                                                   What you’re doing on your
                                                                   device, like whether our app is
                                                                   in the foreground or if your
                                                                   mouse is moving (which can
                                                                   help tell humans from bots)

                                                                   Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                   apart from other users'

                                                                   Device signals

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                    Page 99 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                          9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                 Information you’ve shared
                                                                 through your device settings

                                                                 Location-related information

                                                                 Information about the network
                                                                 you connect your device to,
                                                                 including your IP address

                                                                 Information from cookies and
                                                                 similar technologies

                                                               Information from partners,
                                                               vendors and third parties



                    Identifying you as a Meta Product user     Your activity and information you
                    and personalizing the ads we show you      provide:
                    through Meta Audience Network when
                    you visit other apps:                        Information you provide

                       When we show you ads through Meta         Content you create, like posts,
                       Audience Network when you visit           comments or audio
                       other apps, our systems                   Content you provide through
                       automatically process the information     our camera feature or your
                       we have collected and stored about        camera roll settings, or through
                       you and others to identify you as a       our voice-enabled features
                       Meta Product user and tailor the ads
                       you see.                                  Metadata about content

                                                                 Types of content you view or
                                                                 interact with, and how you
                                                                 interact with it

                                                                 Apps and features you use,
                                                                 and what actions you take in
                                                                 them

                                                                 Purchases or other
                                                                 transactions you make

                                                                 Hashtags you use


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                Page 100 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                  The time, frequency and
                                                                  duration of your activities on
                                                                  our Products

                                                                Friends, followers and other
                                                                connections

                                                                App, browser and device
                                                                information:

                                                                  Device characteristics and
                                                                  device software

                                                                  What you’re doing on your
                                                                  device, like whether our app is
                                                                  in the foreground or if your
                                                                  mouse is moving (which can
                                                                  help tell humans from bots)

                                                                  Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                  apart from other users'

                                                                  Device signals

                                                                  Information you’ve shared
                                                                  through your device settings

                                                                  Information about the network
                                                                  you connect your device to,
                                                                  including your IP address

                                                                  Information from cookies and
                                                                  similar technologies



                    Providing marketing communications to       Your activity and information you
                    you:                                        provide:

                       Depending on your settings and             Information and content you
                       subject to applicable law, we’ll share     provide, including your contact
                       marketing communications with you.         information like email address

                       We’ll collect and store your             App, browser and device

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 101 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                       information and use it to send            information:
                       marketing communications to you,
                       like an email, subject to applicable        Device identifiers
                       laws.



                    Research and innovate for social good:       Your activity and information you
                                                                 provide:
                       We carry out surveys and use
                       information (including from                 Content you create, like posts,
                       researchers we collaborate with) to         comments or audio
                       conduct and support research and
                       innovation on topics of general social      Content you provide through
                       welfare, technological advancement,         our camera feature or your
                       public interest, health and well-being.     camera roll settings, or through
                                                                   our voice-enabled features
                       For example, we analyze information
                       that we have about migration patterns       Metadata about content and
                       during crises. This helps relief            messages, subject to
                       organizations get aid to the right          applicable law
                       places.
                                                                   Types of content you view or
                       We collect, store, combine, analyze         interact with, and how you
                       and apply automatic processing              interact with it
                       techniques like aggregation of              Apps and features you use,
                       information as well as manual               and what actions you take in
                       (human) review, and share                   them
                       information, as necessary to research
                       and innovate for social good in this        Purchases or other
                       way. We do this to do things like           transactions you make
                       create COVID-19 forecasting models.
                                                                   Hashtags you use
                    Learn more about our research
                    programs.                                      The time, frequency and
                                                                   duration of your activities on
                                                                   our Products

                                                                 Friends, followers and other
                                                                 connections

                                                                 App, browser and device
                                                                 information:

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 102 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                  Device characteristics and
                                                                  device software

                                                                  What you’re doing on your
                                                                  device, like whether our app is
                                                                  in the foreground or if your
                                                                  mouse is moving (which can
                                                                  help tell humans from bots)

                                                                  Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                  apart from other users’

                                                                  Device signals

                                                                  Information you’ve shared
                                                                  through your device settings

                                                                  Location-related information

                                                                  Information about the network
                                                                  you connect your device to,
                                                                  including your IP address

                                                                  Information from cookies and
                                                                  similar technologies

                                                                Information from partners,
                                                                vendors and third parties



                    Anonymizing your information                Your activity and information you
                                                                provide:
                    In some cases, we anonymize
                    information we have associated with           Content you create, like posts,
                    you, such as your activity on and off our     comments or audio
                    Products, and use the resulting
                                                                  Content you provide through
                    information, for example, to provide and
                                                                  our camera feature or your
                    improve our Meta Products, including
                                                                  camera roll settings, or through
                    ads.
                                                                  our voice-enabled features

                                                                  Metadata about content

                                                                  Types of content you view or

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 103 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                         9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                               interact with, and how you
                                                               interact with it

                                                               Apps and features you use,
                                                               and what actions you take in
                                                               them

                                                               Purchases or other
                                                               transactions you make

                                                               Hashtags you use

                                                               The time, frequency and
                                                               duration of your activities on
                                                               our Products

                                                             Friends, followers and other
                                                             connections

                                                             App, browser and device
                                                             information:

                                                               Device characteristics and
                                                               device software

                                                               What you’re doing on your
                                                               device, like whether our app is
                                                               in the foreground or if your
                                                               mouse is moving (which can
                                                               help tell humans from bots)

                                                               Identifiers that tell your device
                                                               apart from other users’

                                                               Device signals

                                                               Information you’ve shared
                                                               through your device settings

                                                               Location-related information

                                                               Information about the network
                                                               you connect your device to,
                                                               including your IP address


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                               Page 104 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                               9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                                      Information from cookies and
                                                                      similar technologies

                                                                    Information from partners,
                                                                    vendors and third parties



                    Sharing information with others,                Your activity and information you
                    including law enforcement and to                provide:
                    respond to legal requests.
                                                                      Content you create, like posts,
                    See the "How do we respond to legal               comments or audio
                    requests, prevent harm and promote
                    safety and integrity?" section of the             Content you provide through
                                                                      our camera feature or your
                    Meta Privacy Policy for more for
                                                                      camera roll settings, or through
                    information on when we share
                                                                      our voice-enabled features
                    information with law enforcement and
                    others.                                           Metadata about content,
                                                                      subject to applicable law
                    The categories of information we
                    access, preserve, use and share                   Types of content you view or
                    depend on the specific circumstances.             interact with, and how you
                    For example, responses to legal                   interact with it
                    requests where not compelled by law
                    will typically include limited information        Apps and features you use,
                    (such as contact details and login                and what actions you take in
                    information).                                     them

                    However, the information we process               Purchases or other
                    will depend on the purposes, which                transactions you make
                    could include the following:
                                                                      Hashtags you use
                       In response to legal requests from
                       third parties such as civil litigants, law   Friends, followers and other
                       enforcement and other government             connections
                       authorities
                                                                    App, browser and device
                       To comply with applicable law or             information:
                       legitimate legal purposes
                                                                      Device characteristics and
                       To promote the safety, security and            device software
                       integrity of Meta Companies, Meta

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                     Page 105 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                       Products, users, employees, property      What you’re doing on your
                       and the public                            device, like whether our app is
                                                                 in the foreground or if your
                    Learn more about how we promote              mouse is moving (which can
                    safety, security and integrity.              help tell humans from bots)

                                                                 Identifiers that tell your device
                                                                 apart from other users’

                                                                 Device signals

                                                                 Information you’ve shared
                                                                 through your device settings

                                                                 Location-related information

                                                                 Information about the network
                                                                 you connect your device to,
                                                                 including your IP address

                                                                 Information from cookies and
                                                                 similar technologies

                                                               Information from partners,
                                                               vendors and third parties



                    For processing information when the        The categories of information
                    law requires it: Where we are under an     depend on the specific
                    obligation to disclose information such    circumstances of each mandatory
                    as, for example, if we receive a valid     request or obligation. Only the
                    legal request for certain information      information necessary to comply
                    such as a search warrant, we will          with the relevant legal obligation
                    access, preserve and/or share your         will be shared or otherwise
                    information with regulators, law           processed. For example, for civil
                    enforcement or others.                     matters, this will typically include
                                                               limited information (such as
                    The way in which the information will be   contact details and login
                    processed depends on the specific          information). However, depending
                    circumstances. See the "How do we          on the circumstances it could
                    respond to legal requests, prevent harm    include the following:
                    and promote safety and integrity?"
                    section of the Meta Privacy Policy for     Your activity and information you

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 106 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                           9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                    more. "Information for Law Enforcement     provide:
                    Authorities" provides information on the
                    operational guidelines law enforcement       Content you create, like posts,
                    needs to follow.                             comments or audio

                                                                 Content you provide through
                                                                 our camera feature or your
                                                                 camera roll settings, or through
                                                                 our voice-enabled features

                                                                 Messages you send and
                                                                 receive, including their content,
                                                                 subject to applicable law

                                                                 Metadata about content and
                                                                 messages, subject to
                                                                 applicable law

                                                                 Types of content you view or
                                                                 interact with, and how you
                                                                 interact with it

                                                                 Apps and features you use,
                                                                 and what actions you take in
                                                                 them

                                                                 Purchases or other
                                                                 transactions you make,
                                                                 including truncated credit card
                                                                 information

                                                                 Hashtags you use

                                                                 The time, frequency and
                                                                 duration of your activities on
                                                                 our Products

                                                               Friends, followers and other
                                                               connections

                                                               App, browser and device
                                                               information:

                                                                 Device characteristics and

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                 Page 107 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                         9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                                                               device software

                                                               What you’re doing on your
                                                               device, like whether our app is
                                                               in the foreground or if your
                                                               mouse is moving (which can
                                                               help tell humans from bots)

                                                               Identifiers that tell your device
                                                               apart from other users’

                                                               Device signals

                                                               Information you’ve shared
                                                               through your device settings

                                                               Location-related information

                                                               Information about the network
                                                               you connect your device to,
                                                               including your IP address

                                                               Information from cookies and
                                                               similar technologies

                                                             Information from partners,
                                                             vendors and third parties




                     93


                     What Products does this policy cover?




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                               Page 108 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM




                     This policy describes the information we, Meta Platforms, Inc., process to
                     provide Meta Products. Meta Products, which we also call "Products," include:

                         Facebook

                         Messenger

                         Instagram (including apps like Boomerang and Threads)

                         Facebook Portal products

                         Meta Platforms Technologies Products, such as Meta Horizon Worlds or
                         Meta Quest (when using a Facebook or Meta account)

                         Shops

                         Marketplace

                         Spark AR

                         Meta Business Tools

                         Meta Audience Network

                         Facebook View

                         Meta Pay

                         Meta checkout experiences


                     Some of our Products also have a supplemental privacy policy[100] that adds to

https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                  Page 109 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                             9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     the information provided in this policy.



                     94


                     Metadata
                          Information about the content itself, like the location where a photo was
                          taken or the date a file was created

                          Information about the message itself, like the type of message or the date
                          and time it was sent



                     95


                     Device
                     Devices include computers, phones, hardware, connected TVs, Portal devices
                     and other web-connected devices.



                     96


                     IP address
                     Stands for "internet protocol address." It’s a unique number assigned to a
                     device, like a phone or computer, that allows it to communicate over the
                     internet. Numbers are assigned according to standard guidelines, or protocols.

                     Just like you need a mailing address to receive a letter from a friend, your
                     device needs an IP address to receive information on the internet.



                     97


                     Partner


https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 110 of 111
Meta Privacy Policy - How Meta collects and uses user data                                            9/17/23, 9:02 PM



                     A person, business, organization or body using or integrating our Products to
                     advertise, market or support their products and services



                     98


                     Third party
                     A person, business, organization or body that is not part of the Meta
                     Companies



                     99


                     Service provider
                     A person, business, organization or body that provides services to Meta or to
                     our users on behalf of Meta. For example, our service providers do things like
                     investigate suspicious activity and provide customer support.



                     100


                     Supplemental policies

                        Facebook Portal products


                        Facebook View


                        Free Basics


                        Meta Platforms Technologies Products


                        Oversight Board




https://mbasic.facebook.com/privacy/policy/printable/                                                   Page 111 of 111
